Illinois, session 104th, SB2287.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Employees Group Insurance Act of 1971 5is amended by changing Section 6.11 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 375/6.11)7    Sec. 6.11. Required health benefits; Illinois Insurance 8Code requirements. The program of health benefits shall 9provide the post-mastectomy care benefits required to be 10covered by a policy of accident and health insurance under 11Section 356t of the Illinois Insurance Code. The program of 12health benefits shall provide the coverage required under 13Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 14356w, 356x, 356z.2, 356z.3b, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 15356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 16356z.15, 356z.17, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 17356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 18356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.55, 356z.56, 356z.57, 19356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 20and 356z.70, and 356z.71, 356z.74, 356z.76, and 356z.77 of the 21Illinois Insurance Code. The program of health benefits must 22comply with Sections 155.22a, 155.37, 355b, 356z.19, 370c, and 23370c.1 and Article XXXIIB of the Illinois Insurance Code. The   SB2287- 2 -LRB104 10420 BAB 20495 b1program of health benefits shall provide the coverage required 2under Section 356m of the Illinois Insurance Code and, for the 3employees of the State Employee Group Insurance Program only, 4the coverage as also provided in Section 6.11B of this Act. The 5Department of Insurance shall enforce the requirements of this 6Section with respect to Sections 370c and 370c.1 of the 7Illinois Insurance Code; all other requirements of this 8Section shall be enforced by the Department of Central 9Management Services.10    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 11any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 12with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 13Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 14Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 15whatever reason, is unauthorized. 16(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 17102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 181-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-768, 19eff. 1-1-24; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 20102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 211-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-8, eff. 1-1-24; 103-84, 22eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 23103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 248-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, 25eff. 8-2-24; 103-870, eff. 1-1-25; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 26103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-951, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff.   SB2287- 3 -LRB104 10420 BAB 20495 b11-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 2    Section 10. The Counties Code is amended by changing 3Section 5-1069.3 as follows: 4    (55 ILCS 5/5-1069.3)5    Sec. 5-1069.3. Required health benefits. If a county, 6including a home rule county, is a self-insurer for purposes 7of providing health insurance coverage for its employees, the 8coverage shall include coverage for the post-mastectomy care 9benefits required to be covered by a policy of accident and 10health insurance under Section 356t and the coverage required 11under Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 12356u.10, 356w, 356x, 356z.3b, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 13356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 14356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 15356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 16356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 17356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, and 356z.70, and 18356z.71, 356z.74, and 356z.77 of the Illinois Insurance Code. 19The coverage shall comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, 20356z.19, and 370c of the Illinois Insurance Code. The 21Department of Insurance shall enforce the requirements of this 22Section. The requirement that health benefits be covered as 23provided in this Section is an exclusive power and function of 24the State and is a denial and limitation under Article VII,   SB2287- 4 -LRB104 10420 BAB 20495 b1Section 6, subsection (h) of the Illinois Constitution. A home 2rule county to which this Section applies must comply with 3every provision of this Section. 4    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 5any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 6with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 7Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 8Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 9whatever reason, is unauthorized. 10(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 11102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 121-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, 13eff. 1-1-23; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 14102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 151-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 16eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 17103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 187-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, 19eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 20revised 11-26-24.) 21    Section 15. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 22changing Section 10-4-2.3 as follows: 23    (65 ILCS 5/10-4-2.3)24    Sec. 10-4-2.3. Required health benefits. If a   SB2287- 5 -LRB104 10420 BAB 20495 b1municipality, including a home rule municipality, is a 2self-insurer for purposes of providing health insurance 3coverage for its employees, the coverage shall include 4coverage for the post-mastectomy care benefits required to be 5covered by a policy of accident and health insurance under 6Section 356t and the coverage required under Sections 356g, 7356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 356w, 356x, 8356z.3b, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.10, 9356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.22, 356z.25, 10356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 11356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.51, 356z.53, 12356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 13356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, and 356z.70, and 356z.71, 356z.74, 14and 356z.77 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The coverage shall 15comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, 356z.19, and 370c of the 16Illinois Insurance Code. The Department of Insurance shall 17enforce the requirements of this Section. The requirement that 18health benefits be covered as provided in this is an exclusive 19power and function of the State and is a denial and limitation 20under Article VII, Section 6, subsection (h) of the Illinois 21Constitution. A home rule municipality to which this Section 22applies must comply with every provision of this Section. 23    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 24any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 25with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 26Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on   SB2287- 6 -LRB104 10420 BAB 20495 b1Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 2whatever reason, is unauthorized. 3(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 4102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 51-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, 6eff. 1-1-23; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 7102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 81-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 9eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 10103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 117-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, 12eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 13revised 11-26-24.) 14    Section 20. The School Code is amended by changing Section 1510-22.3f as follows: 16    (105 ILCS 5/10-22.3f)17    Sec. 10-22.3f. Required health benefits. Insurance 18protection and benefits for employees shall provide the 19post-mastectomy care benefits required to be covered by a 20policy of accident and health insurance under Section 356t and 21the coverage required under Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 22356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 356w, 356x, 356z.3b, 356z.4, 23356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 24356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30,   SB2287- 7 -LRB104 10420 BAB 20495 b1356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 2356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 3356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, and 4356z.70, and 356z.71, 356z.74, and 356z.77 of the Illinois 5Insurance Code. Insurance policies shall comply with Section 6356z.19 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The coverage shall 7comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, and 370c of the Illinois 8Insurance Code. The Department of Insurance shall enforce the 9requirements of this Section. 10    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 11any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 12with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 13Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 14Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 15whatever reason, is unauthorized. 16(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 17102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 181-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-804, 19eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 20102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 211-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, 22eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 23103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, eff. 247-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, 25eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 11-26-24.)   SB2287- 8 -LRB104 10420 BAB 20495 b1    Section 22. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 2adding Section 356z.3b as follows: 3    (215 ILCS 5/356z.3b new)4    Sec. 356z.3b. Mental health access and continuity of care.5    (a) As used in this Section:6    "Health care provider" means a provider as defined in 7subsection (d) of Section 370g of this Code. "Health care 8provider" does not include a provider of air ambulance or 9ground ambulance services.10    "Health insurance issuer" has the meaning given to that 11term in Section 5 of the Illinois Health Insurance Portability 12and Accountability Act.13    "Mental health services" means services provided by 14licensed mental health professionals, including, but not 15limited to, therapy, counseling, psychiatric evaluation, and 16medication management.17    "Nonparticipating provider" means, with respect to the 18furnishing of an item or service under a policy of group or 19individual health insurance coverage, any health care provider 20who does not have a contractual relationship directly or 21indirectly with a health insurance issuer in relation to the 22coverage.23    "Participating health care facility" means any health care 24facility that has a contractual relationship directly or 25indirectly with a health insurance issuer offering group or   SB2287- 9 -LRB104 10420 BAB 20495 b1individual health insurance coverage setting forth the terms 2and conditions on which a relevant health care service is 3provided to an insured, beneficiary, or enrollee under the 4coverage.5    "Participating provider" means any health care provider 6that has a contractual relationship directly or indirectly 7with a health insurance issuer offering group or individual 8health insurance coverage setting forth the terms and 9conditions on which a relevant health care service is provided 10to an insured, beneficiary, or enrollee under the coverage.11    (b) When a beneficiary, insured, or enrollee receives 12mental health services from a nonparticipating provider or a 13nonparticipating health care facility, the health insurance 14issuer shall ensure that the beneficiary, insured, or enrollee 15shall incur no greater out-of-pocket costs than the 16beneficiary, insured, or enrollee would have incurred with a 17participating provider or a participating health care 18facility. Any cost-sharing requirements shall be applied as 19though the mental health services had been received from a 20participating provider or a participating health care 21facility. If the cost sharing for the same item or service 22furnished by a participating provider would have been a 23flat-dollar copayment, that amount shall be the cost-sharing 24amount unless the provider has billed a lesser total amount. 25Administrative requirements or limitations shall be no greater 26than those applicable to emergency services received from a   SB2287- 10 -LRB104 10420 BAB 20495 b1participating provider or a participating health care 2facility.3    (c) A beneficiary, insured, or enrollee receiving ongoing 4mental health services from a nonparticipating provider shall 5be permitted to continue treatment with the nonparticipating 6provider for up to one year after the start of services or one 7year after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 8104th General Assembly, whichever is later, as if the mental 9health services were provided by a participating provider. 10    Section 25. The Health Maintenance Organization Act is 11amended by changing Section 5-3 as follows: 12    (215 ILCS 125/5-3)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1411.2)13    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-808)14    Sec. 5-3. Insurance Code provisions. 15    (a) Health Maintenance Organizations shall be subject to 16the provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 17141.1, 141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 18152, 153, 154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.22a, 19155.49, 352c, 355.2, 355.3, 355.6, 355b, 355c, 356f, 356g.5-1, 20356m, 356q, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356z.2, 356z.3a, 21356z.3b, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 22356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.17, 23356z.18, 356z.19, 356z.20, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.23, 356z.24, 24356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.28, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.31, 356z.32,   SB2287- 11 -LRB104 10420 BAB 20495 b1356z.33, 356z.34, 356z.35, 356z.36, 356z.37, 356z.38, 356z.39, 2356z.40, 356z.40a, 356z.41, 356z.44, 356z.45, 356z.46, 3356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.49, 356z.50, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 4356z.55, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.58, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 5356z.62, 356z.63, 356z.64, 356z.65, 356z.66, 356z.67, 356z.68, 6356z.69, 356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.72, 356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 7356z.77, 364, 364.01, 364.3, 367.2, 367.2-5, 367i, 368a, 368b, 8368c, 368d, 368e, 370c, 370c.1, 401, 401.1, 402, 403, 403A, 9408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, and 444.1, paragraph (c) of 10subsection (2) of Section 367, and Articles IIA, VIII 1/2, 11XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, XXVI, and XXXIIB of the 12Illinois Insurance Code.13    (b) For purposes of the Illinois Insurance Code, except 14for Sections 444 and 444.1 and Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, 15Health Maintenance Organizations in the following categories 16are deemed to be "domestic companies":17        (1) a corporation authorized under the Dental Service 18    Plan Act or the Voluntary Health Services Plans Act;19        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of this 20    State; or21        (3) a corporation organized under the laws of another 22    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 23    of this State, except a corporation subject to 24    substantially the same requirements in its state of 25    organization as is a "domestic company" under Article VIII 26    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.  SB2287- 12 -LRB104 10420 BAB 20495 b1    (c) In considering the merger, consolidation, or other 2acquisition of control of a Health Maintenance Organization 3pursuant to Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code,4        (1) the Director shall give primary consideration to 5    the continuation of benefits to enrollees and the 6    financial conditions of the acquired Health Maintenance 7    Organization after the merger, consolidation, or other 8    acquisition of control takes effect;9        (2)(i) the criteria specified in subsection (1)(b) of 10    Section 131.8 of the Illinois Insurance Code shall not 11    apply and (ii) the Director, in making his determination 12    with respect to the merger, consolidation, or other 13    acquisition of control, need not take into account the 14    effect on competition of the merger, consolidation, or 15    other acquisition of control;16        (3) the Director shall have the power to require the 17    following information:18            (A) certification by an independent actuary of the 19        adequacy of the reserves of the Health Maintenance 20        Organization sought to be acquired;21            (B) pro forma financial statements reflecting the 22        combined balance sheets of the acquiring company and 23        the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 24        acquired as of the end of the preceding year and as of 25        a date 90 days prior to the acquisition, as well as pro 26        forma financial statements reflecting projected   SB2287- 13 -LRB104 10420 BAB 20495 b1        combined operation for a period of 2 years;2            (C) a pro forma business plan detailing an 3        acquiring party's plans with respect to the operation 4        of the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 5        acquired for a period of not less than 3 years; and6            (D) such other information as the Director shall 7        require.8    (d) The provisions of Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois 9Insurance Code and this Section 5-3 shall apply to the sale by 10any health maintenance organization of greater than 10% of its 11enrollee population (including, without limitation, the health 12maintenance organization's right, title, and interest in and 13to its health care certificates).14    (e) In considering any management contract or service 15agreement subject to Section 141.1 of the Illinois Insurance 16Code, the Director (i) shall, in addition to the criteria 17specified in Section 141.2 of the Illinois Insurance Code, 18take into account the effect of the management contract or 19service agreement on the continuation of benefits to enrollees 20and the financial condition of the health maintenance 21organization to be managed or serviced, and (ii) need not take 22into account the effect of the management contract or service 23agreement on competition.24    (f) Except for small employer groups as defined in the 25Small Employer Rating, Renewability and Portability Health 26Insurance Act and except for medicare supplement policies as   SB2287- 14 -LRB104 10420 BAB 20495 b1defined in Section 363 of the Illinois Insurance Code, a 2Health Maintenance Organization may by contract agree with a 3group or other enrollment unit to effect refunds or charge 4additional premiums under the following terms and conditions:5        (i) the amount of, and other terms and conditions with 6    respect to, the refund or additional premium are set forth 7    in the group or enrollment unit contract agreed in advance 8    of the period for which a refund is to be paid or 9    additional premium is to be charged (which period shall 10    not be less than one year); and11        (ii) the amount of the refund or additional premium 12    shall not exceed 20% of the Health Maintenance 13    Organization's profitable or unprofitable experience with 14    respect to the group or other enrollment unit for the 15    period (and, for purposes of a refund or additional 16    premium, the profitable or unprofitable experience shall 17    be calculated taking into account a pro rata share of the 18    Health Maintenance Organization's administrative and 19    marketing expenses, but shall not include any refund to be 20    made or additional premium to be paid pursuant to this 21    subsection (f)). The Health Maintenance Organization and 22    the group or enrollment unit may agree that the profitable 23    or unprofitable experience may be calculated taking into 24    account the refund period and the immediately preceding 2 25    plan years.26    The Health Maintenance Organization shall include a   SB2287- 15 -LRB104 10420 BAB 20495 b1statement in the evidence of coverage issued to each enrollee 2describing the possibility of a refund or additional premium, 3and upon request of any group or enrollment unit, provide to 4the group or enrollment unit a description of the method used 5to calculate (1) the Health Maintenance Organization's 6profitable experience with respect to the group or enrollment 7unit and the resulting refund to the group or enrollment unit 8or (2) the Health Maintenance Organization's unprofitable 9experience with respect to the group or enrollment unit and 10the resulting additional premium to be paid by the group or 11enrollment unit.12    In no event shall the Illinois Health Maintenance 13Organization Guaranty Association be liable to pay any 14contractual obligation of an insolvent organization to pay any 15refund authorized under this Section.16    (g) Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, 17if any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in 18accordance with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative 19Procedure Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint 20Committee on Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so 21adopted, for whatever reason, is unauthorized. 22(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-34, eff. 6-25-21; 23102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 241-1-22; 102-589, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, 25eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 26102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff.   SB2287- 16 -LRB104 10420 BAB 20495 b11-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-901, eff. 7-1-22; 102-1093, 2eff. 1-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 3103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-123, eff. 1-1-24; 103-154, eff. 46-30-23; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, 5eff. 1-1-24; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 6103-618, eff. 1-1-25; 103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 103-656, eff. 71-1-25; 103-700, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, 8eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 9103-777, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 101-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 9-26-24.) 11    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-808)12    Sec. 5-3. Insurance Code provisions. 13    (a) Health Maintenance Organizations shall be subject to 14the provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 15141.1, 141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 16152, 153, 154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.22a, 17155.49, 352c, 355.2, 355.3, 355.6, 355b, 355c, 356f, 356g, 18356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356z.2, 19356z.3a, 356z.3b, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 20356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 21356z.17, 356z.18, 356z.19, 356z.20, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.23, 22356z.24, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.28, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.31, 23356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.34, 356z.35, 356z.36, 356z.37, 356z.38, 24356z.39, 356z.40, 356z.40a, 356z.41, 356z.44, 356z.45, 25356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.49, 356z.50, 356z.51, 356z.53,   SB2287- 17 -LRB104 10420 BAB 20495 b1356z.54, 356z.55, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.58, 356z.59, 356z.60, 2356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.63, 356z.64, 356z.65, 356z.66, 356z.67, 3356z.68, 356z.69, 356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.72, 356z.73, 356z.74, 4356z.75, 356z.77, 364, 364.01, 364.3, 367.2, 367.2-5, 367i, 5368a, 368b, 368c, 368d, 368e, 370c, 370c.1, 401, 401.1, 402, 6403, 403A, 408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, and 444.1, paragraph (c) 7of subsection (2) of Section 367, and Articles IIA, VIII 1/2, 8XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, XXVI, and XXXIIB of the 9Illinois Insurance Code.10    (b) For purposes of the Illinois Insurance Code, except 11for Sections 444 and 444.1 and Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, 12Health Maintenance Organizations in the following categories 13are deemed to be "domestic companies":14        (1) a corporation authorized under the Dental Service 15    Plan Act or the Voluntary Health Services Plans Act;16        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of this 17    State; or18        (3) a corporation organized under the laws of another 19    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 20    of this State, except a corporation subject to 21    substantially the same requirements in its state of 22    organization as is a "domestic company" under Article VIII 23    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.24    (c) In considering the merger, consolidation, or other 25acquisition of control of a Health Maintenance Organization 26pursuant to Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code,  SB2287- 18 -LRB104 10420 BAB 20495 b1        (1) the Director shall give primary consideration to 2    the continuation of benefits to enrollees and the 3    financial conditions of the acquired Health Maintenance 4    Organization after the merger, consolidation, or other 5    acquisition of control takes effect;6        (2)(i) the criteria specified in subsection (1)(b) of 7    Section 131.8 of the Illinois Insurance Code shall not 8    apply and (ii) the Director, in making his determination 9    with respect to the merger, consolidation, or other 10    acquisition of control, need not take into account the 11    effect on competition of the merger, consolidation, or 12    other acquisition of control;13        (3) the Director shall have the power to require the 14    following information:15            (A) certification by an independent actuary of the 16        adequacy of the reserves of the Health Maintenance 17        Organization sought to be acquired;18            (B) pro forma financial statements reflecting the 19        combined balance sheets of the acquiring company and 20        the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 21        acquired as of the end of the preceding year and as of 22        a date 90 days prior to the acquisition, as well as pro 23        forma financial statements reflecting projected 24        combined operation for a period of 2 years;25            (C) a pro forma business plan detailing an 26        acquiring party's plans with respect to the operation   SB2287- 19 -LRB104 10420 BAB 20495 b1        of the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 2        acquired for a period of not less than 3 years; and3            (D) such other information as the Director shall 4        require.5    (d) The provisions of Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois 6Insurance Code and this Section 5-3 shall apply to the sale by 7any health maintenance organization of greater than 10% of its 8enrollee population (including, without limitation, the health 9maintenance organization's right, title, and interest in and 10to its health care certificates).11    (e) In considering any management contract or service 12agreement subject to Section 141.1 of the Illinois Insurance 13Code, the Director (i) shall, in addition to the criteria 14specified in Section 141.2 of the Illinois Insurance Code, 15take into account the effect of the management contract or 16service agreement on the continuation of benefits to enrollees 17and the financial condition of the health maintenance 18organization to be managed or serviced, and (ii) need not take 19into account the effect of the management contract or service 20agreement on competition.21    (f) Except for small employer groups as defined in the 22Small Employer Rating, Renewability and Portability Health 23Insurance Act and except for medicare supplement policies as 24defined in Section 363 of the Illinois Insurance Code, a 25Health Maintenance Organization may by contract agree with a 26group or other enrollment unit to effect refunds or charge   SB2287- 20 -LRB104 10420 BAB 20495 b1additional premiums under the following terms and conditions:2        (i) the amount of, and other terms and conditions with 3    respect to, the refund or additional premium are set forth 4    in the group or enrollment unit contract agreed in advance 5    of the period for which a refund is to be paid or 6    additional premium is to be charged (which period shall 7    not be less than one year); and8        (ii) the amount of the refund or additional premium 9    shall not exceed 20% of the Health Maintenance 10    Organization's profitable or unprofitable experience with 11    respect to the group or other enrollment unit for the 12    period (and, for purposes of a refund or additional 13    premium, the profitable or unprofitable experience shall 14    be calculated taking into account a pro rata share of the 15    Health Maintenance Organization's administrative and 16    marketing expenses, but shall not include any refund to be 17    made or additional premium to be paid pursuant to this 18    subsection (f)). The Health Maintenance Organization and 19    the group or enrollment unit may agree that the profitable 20    or unprofitable experience may be calculated taking into 21    account the refund period and the immediately preceding 2 22    plan years.23    The Health Maintenance Organization shall include a 24statement in the evidence of coverage issued to each enrollee 25describing the possibility of a refund or additional premium, 26and upon request of any group or enrollment unit, provide to   SB2287- 21 -LRB104 10420 BAB 20495 b1the group or enrollment unit a description of the method used 2to calculate (1) the Health Maintenance Organization's 3profitable experience with respect to the group or enrollment 4unit and the resulting refund to the group or enrollment unit 5or (2) the Health Maintenance Organization's unprofitable 6experience with respect to the group or enrollment unit and 7the resulting additional premium to be paid by the group or 8enrollment unit.9    In no event shall the Illinois Health Maintenance 10Organization Guaranty Association be liable to pay any 11contractual obligation of an insolvent organization to pay any 12refund authorized under this Section.13    (g) Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, 14if any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in 15accordance with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative 16Procedure Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint 17Committee on Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so 18adopted, for whatever reason, is unauthorized. 19(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-34, eff. 6-25-21; 20102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 211-1-22; 102-589, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, 22eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 23102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 241-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-901, eff. 7-1-22; 102-1093, 25eff. 1-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 26103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-123, eff. 1-1-24; 103-154, eff.   SB2287- 22 -LRB104 10420 BAB 20495 b16-30-23; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, 2eff. 1-1-24; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 3103-618, eff. 1-1-25; 103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 103-656, eff. 41-1-25; 103-700, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, 5eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 6103-777, eff. 8-2-24; 103-808, eff. 1-1-26; 103-914, eff. 71-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 811-26-24.) 9    Section 30. The Limited Health Service Organization Act is 10amended by changing Section 4003 as follows: 11    (215 ILCS 130/4003)  (from Ch. 73, par. 1504-3)12    Sec. 4003. Illinois Insurance Code provisions. Limited 13health service organizations shall be subject to the 14provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 141.1, 15141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 152, 153, 16154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.37, 155.49, 352c, 17355.2, 355.3, 355b, 355d, 356m, 356q, 356v, 356z.3b, 356z.4, 18356z.4a, 356z.10, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 19356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.41, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 20356z.54, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.61, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 21356z.71, 356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 364.3, 368a, 401, 401.1, 22402, 403, 403A, 408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, and 444.1 and 23Articles IIA, VIII 1/2, XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, and 24XXVI of the Illinois Insurance Code. Nothing in this Section   SB2287- 23 -LRB104 10420 BAB 20495 b1shall require a limited health care plan to cover any service 2that is not a limited health service. For purposes of the 3Illinois Insurance Code, except for Sections 444 and 444.1 and 4Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, limited health service 5organizations in the following categories are deemed to be 6domestic companies:7        (1) a corporation under the laws of this State; or8        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of another 9    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 10    of this State, except a corporation subject to 11    substantially the same requirements in its state of 12    organization as is a domestic company under Article VIII 13    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.14(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 15102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-731, eff. 161-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, 17eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 1-1-23; 18102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 191-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, 20eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 21103-656, eff. 1-1-25; 103-700, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, eff. 227-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-832, 23eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 24    Section 35. The Voluntary Health Services Plans Act is 25amended by changing Section 10 as follows:   SB2287- 24 -LRB104 10420 BAB 20495 b1    (215 ILCS 165/10)  (from Ch. 32, par. 604)2    Sec. 10. Application of Insurance Code provisions. Health 3services plan corporations and all persons interested therein 4or dealing therewith shall be subject to the provisions of 5Articles IIA and XII 1/2 and Sections 3.1, 133, 136, 139, 140, 6143, 143.31, 143c, 149, 155.22a, 155.37, 354, 355.2, 355.3, 7355b, 355d, 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356r, 356t, 8356u, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356y, 356z.1, 356z.2, 9356z.3a, 356z.3b, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 10356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 11356z.18, 356z.19, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 12356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.32a, 356z.33, 356z.40, 356z.41, 13356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 14356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 15356z.71, 356z.72, 356z.74, 356z.75, 356z.77, 364.01, 364.3, 16367.2, 368a, 401, 401.1, 402, 403, 403A, 408, 408.2, and 412, 17and paragraphs (7) and (15) of Section 367 of the Illinois 18Insurance Code.19    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 20any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 21with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 22Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 23Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 24whatever reason, is unauthorized. 25(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-203, eff. 1-1-22;   SB2287- 25 -LRB104 10420 BAB 20495 b1102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, eff. 210-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 102-804, 3eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 4102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-901, eff. 7-1-22; 102-1093, eff. 51-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 6eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 7103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-656, eff. 81-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, 9eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-832, eff. 1-1-25; 10103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 111-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 12    Section 40. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 13changing Section 5-16.8 as follows: 14    (305 ILCS 5/5-16.8)15    Sec. 5-16.8. Required health benefits. The medical 16assistance program shall (i) provide the post-mastectomy care 17benefits required to be covered by a policy of accident and 18health insurance under Section 356t and the coverage required 19under Sections 356g.5, 356q, 356u, 356w, 356x, 356z.3b, 20356z.6, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.34, 356z.35, 21356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 22356z.64, and 356z.67, and 356z.71, and 356z.75 of the Illinois 23Insurance Code, (ii) be subject to the provisions of Sections 24356z.19, 356z.44, 356z.49, 364.01, 370c, and 370c.1 of the   SB2287- 26 -LRB104 10420 BAB 20495 b1Illinois Insurance Code, and (iii) be subject to the 2provisions of subsection (d-5) of Section 10 of the Network 3Adequacy and Transparency Act.4    The Department, by rule, shall adopt a model similar to 5the requirements of Section 356z.39 of the Illinois Insurance 6Code. 7    On and after July 1, 2012, the Department shall reduce any 8rate of reimbursement for services or other payments or alter 9any methodologies authorized by this Code to reduce any rate 10of reimbursement for services or other payments in accordance 11with Section 5-5e. 12    To ensure full access to the benefits set forth in this 13Section, on and after January 1, 2016, the Department shall 14ensure that provider and hospital reimbursement for 15post-mastectomy care benefits required under this Section are 16no lower than the Medicare reimbursement rate. 17(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-144, eff. 1-1-22; 18102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-530, eff. 191-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, 20eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 1-1-23; 21102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 221-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-703, 23eff. 1-1-25; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 24revised 11-26-24.) 25    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes   SB2287- 27 -LRB104 10420 BAB 20495 b1changes in a statute that is represented by text that is not 2yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section represented 3by multiple versions), the use of that text does not 4accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes made 5by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other Public 6Act. 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 81, 2027.